Tennessee, session 114, SB1105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1317(b), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
( ) Destroyed or recycled.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1317(g)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) A weapon that may be evidence in an official proceeding shall be retained or
otherwise preserved in accordance with the rules or practices regulating the preservation
of evidence. The weapon shall be sold, destroyed, recycled, or retained for legitimate
law enforcement purposes not less than sixty (60) days nor more than one hundred
eighty (180) days after the last legal proceeding involving the weapon; provided, that the
requirements of subdivision (g)(2) have been met; and
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1105
002012
- 1 -